nl: Locomotief wielopstelling (Whyte-notatie): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Geleed (bijv.; Overige
nb: Oppsett av lokomotivhjul (Whyte-notasjon): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Leddet (f.eks.; Annet
el: Διάταξη τροχού ατμομηχανής (σημειογραφία Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Αρθρωτό (π.χ.; Άλλο
da: Lokomotivets hjularrangement (Whyte-notation): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Leddelt (f.eks.; Andet
th: การจัดเรียงล้อของหัวรถจักร (ตามแบบของไวท์): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); แบบพ่วงเชื่อมกัน (เช่น; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Aranjamentul roților locomotivei (notația Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Articulat (de ex.; Altele
ru: Колесная формула локомотива (нотация Уайта): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Декапод); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Могул); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Консолидейшн); 2-8-2 (Микадо); 4-4-0 (Американец); 4-6-0 (Десятиколесник); 4-6-2 (Пасифик); 4-6-4 (Гудзон); 4-8-2 (Маунтин); 4-8-4 (Нортерн); Сочлененный (напр.; Другое
cs: Uspořádání kol lokomotivy (Whyteova notace): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Článková (např.; Jiné
pt-BR: Locomotiva disposição das rodas (notação Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Articulado (ex.:; Outro
ko: 기관차 바퀴 배열(와이트 표기법): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0(데카포드); 2-10-2; 2-6-0(모굴); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0(콘솔리데이션); 2-8-2(미카도); 4-4-0(아메리칸); 4-6-0(텐 휠러); 4-6-2(퍼시픽); 4-6-4(허드슨); 4-8-2(마운틴); 4-8-4(노던); 관절형(예:; 기타
ja: 機関車の車輪配置（ホワイト記法）: 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (デカポッド); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (モーガル); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (コンソリデーション); 2-8-2 (ミカド); 4-4-0 (アメリカン); 4-6-0 (テンホイラー); 4-6-2 (パシフィック); 4-6-4 (ハドソン); 4-8-2 (マウンテン); 4-8-4 (ノーザン); 関節式 (例:; その他
hu: Mozdony kerékelrendezése (Whyte-jelölés): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Csuklós (pl.; Egyéb
sv: Lokomotivhjulsarrangemang (Whyte-notation): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Ledat (t.ex.; Övrigt
de: Radanordnung der Lokomotive (Whyte-Notation): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-Wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Gelenklokomotive (z. B.; Sonstige
bg-BG: Колесното разположение на локомотива (нотация на Уайт): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Шарнирен (напр.; Други
lt-LT: Lokomotyvo ratų formulė (Whyte žymėjimas): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Lanksčioji (pvz.; Kita
zh-TW: 火車頭輪式排列（Whyte 標記法）: 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); 關節式 (例如：; 其他
vi: Sơ đồ bố trí bánh xe đầu máy (ký hiệu Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Khớp nối (ví dụ:; Khác
fi: Veturin pyörien asettelu (Whyte-merkintä): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Nivelletty (esim.; Muu
hr-HR: Raspored kotača lokomotive (Whyteova notacija): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Zglobna (npr.; Ostalo
pl: Układ osi lokomotywy według notacji Whyte’a: 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Członowa (np.; Inne
es: Disposición de las ruedas de la locomotora (notación Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Articulado (p. ej.; Otro
en: Locomotive wheel arrangement (Whyte notation): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Articulated (e.g.; Other
sl-SI: Razporeditev koles lokomotive (Whyteova notacija): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Členkasta (npr.; Drugo
fr: Disposition des essieux de la locomotive (notation Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Articulé (p. ex.; Autre
zh-CN: 机车轮式配置（怀特轮式表示法）: 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0（十脚型）; 2-10-2; 2-6-0（莫卧儿型）; 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0（巩固型）; 2-8-2（天皇型）; 4-4-0（美国型）; 4-6-0（十轮型）; 4-6-2（太平洋型）; 4-6-4（哈德逊型）; 4-8-2（山地型）; 4-8-4（北方型）; 铰接式（例如; 其他
sk-SK: Usporiadanie kolies lokomotívy (Whyteho notácia): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Kĺbová (napr.; Iné
it: Disposizione delle ruote della locomotiva (notazione Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Articolata (ad es.; Altro
pt-PT: Disposição das rodas da locomotiva (notação de Whyte): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Articulado (ex.:; Outro
tr: Lokomotif tekerlek düzeni (Whyte gösterimi): 0-4-0; 0-6-0; 0-8-0; 2-10-0 (Decapod); 2-10-2; 2-6-0 (Mogul); 2-6-6-2); 2-8-0 (Consolidation); 2-8-2 (Mikado); 4-4-0 (American); 4-6-0 (Ten-wheeler); 4-6-2 (Pacific); 4-6-4 (Hudson); 4-8-2 (Mountain); 4-8-4 (Northern); Mafsallı (örn.; Diğer